Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.140

Gambling commission—Investigations—Inspections—Hearing and subpoena power—Administrative law judges.

(1) The commission or its authorized representative may:

(a) Make necessary public or private investigations within or outside of this state to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder; and

(b) Inspect the books, documents, and records of any person lending money to or in any manner financing any license holder or applicant for a license or receiving any income or profits from the use of such license for the purpose of determining compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the commission or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW may conduct hearings, administer oaths or affirmations, or upon the commission's or administrative law judge's motion or upon request of any party may subpoena witnesses, compel attendance, take depositions, take evidence, or require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation or proceeding, including but not limited to the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, or location of any books, documents, or other tangible things, or the identity or location of persons having knowledge or relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

(3) Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the administrative law judge and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the superior court for an order compelling compliance.

(4) The administrative law judges appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW may conduct hearings respecting the suspension, revocation, or denial of licenses, who may administer oaths, admit or deny admission of evidence, compel the attendance of witnesses, issue subpoenas, issue orders, and exercise all other powers and perform all other functions set out in RCW 34.05.446, 34.05.449, and 34.05.452.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings under this chapter shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 175 s 42; 1981 c 67 s 16; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.